Ohio, session 136, HB803.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 3345.91 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3345.91. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Animal" means any vertebrate other than a human being. (2) "Animal testing facility" means a facility that confines and uses animals for research, education, testing, or other scientific purposes. (3) "State institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. (B) Each state institution of higher education that operates or maintains an animal testing facility shall, not later than April 1, 2028, and by the first day of April of each year thereafter, publish on its public web site, in a readily accessible form, a report containing all of the following information: (1) An explanation of what progress, if any, the animal testing facility made during the preceding calendar year on replacement, reduction, and refinement efforts, including any of the following: (a) The replacement of, or reduction in, the number of animals required for research, educational, testing, experimental, scientific, or biomedical purposes; (b) The expansion of the use of research methods that either do not use animals or that use fewer animals; (c) The minimization of pain, suffering, distress, or lasting harm animals may experience. (2) An explanation of the methodology used to measure the progress described in division (A)(1) of this section and the reason why the methodology was chosen; (3) The total number of animals disaggregated by species used by the institution during the preceding calendar year for research, educational, testing, experimental, scientific, or biomedical purposes; (4) An estimated percentage of state funds expended by the institution to procure, use, and maintain animals in the preceding calendar year. (C) No report published under this section shall include information on animals used in research performed solely for agricultural purposes. (D) If a state institution of higher education fails to publish its report by the deadline under division (B) of this section, the chancellor of higher education shall impose a fine of not more than one thousand dollars for each day of the violation.